District of Columbia statutes.
42-844.06

Repealed

Rulemaking authority.

Repealed.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263, § 1406, 48 DCR 991
Oct. 26, 2001, D.C. Law 14-42, § 20(a), 48 DCR 7612
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(a), 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).
Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 20(a) of Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-108, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7622).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of chapter, see § 403(a) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to DC Law 13-263, The “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Act of 2000”, see Mayor’s Order 2001-91, June 22, 2001 ( 48 DCR 6010).